Hawaii statutes.
§662-11 Compromise. (a) The attorney
general may arbitrate, compromise, or settle any claim cognizable under this
chapter.

(b) Claims arbitrated, compromised, or settled
by the attorney general for $10,000 or less shall be paid from the state risk
management revolving fund. Claims arbitrated, compromised, or settled by the
attorney general for more than $10,000 shall be paid only after funds are
appropriated by the legislature for the payment of those claims. [L 1957, c
312, pt of §1; Supp, §245A-11; am L 1967, c 232, §1; HRS §662-11; am L 1988, c
336, §1; am L 1990, c 117, §3]

Cross References

State risk management revolving fund, see §41D-4.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next